Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1339.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 289, O.S.L.
2023, as last amended by Section 2, Chapter 480, O.S.L. 2025 (70
O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 18-114.15), is amended to read as follows:
Section 18-114.15. A. Beginning with the 2025-2026 school
year, certified personnel, as defined in Section 26-103 of this
title, in the public schools of this state shall receive in salary
and/or and fringe benefits not less than the amounts specified in
the following schedule:
MINIMUM SALARY SCHEDULE
National
Years of Bachelor’s Board Master’s Doctor’s
Experience Degree Certification Degree Degree
0 $39,601 $40,759 $40,991 $42,381
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1339 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

1 $40,035 $41,193 $41,425 $42,815
2 $40,469 $41,628 $41,859 $43,249
3 $40,904 $42,062 $42,294 $43,684
4 $41,338 $42,496 $42,728 $44,118
5 $42,810 $43,968 $44,200 $45,590
6 $43,273 $44,432 $44,663 $46,054
7 $43,737 $44,895 $45,127 $46,517
8 $44,200 $45,358 $45,590 $46,980
9 $44,663 $45,822 $46,054 $47,444
10 $46,684 $47,844 $48,568 $50,945
11 $47,177 $48,336 $49,061 $51,438
12 $47,670 $48,829 $49,554 $51,931
13 $48,162 $49,322 $50,047 $52,424
14 $48,655 $49,815 $50,539 $52,916
15 $50,167 $51,327 $52,052 $54,430
16 $50,660 $51,820 $52,545 $54,923
17 $51,153 $52,313 $53,038 $55,416
18 $51,646 $52,806 $53,531 $55,909
19 $52,139 $53,299 $54,024 $56,402
20 $52,652 $53,813 $54,538 $56,917
21 $53,145 $54,306 $55,031 $57,410
22 $53,639 $54,799 $55,524 $57,903
23 $54,132 $55,292 $56,018 $58,397
24 $54,625 $55,785 $56,511 $58,890
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1339 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

25 $56,049 $57,232 $57,971 $60,395
26 $56,542 $57,725 $58,464 $60,888
27 $57,035 $58,218 $58,957 $61,381
28 $57,528 $58,711 $59,450 $61,874
29 $58,021 $59,204 $59,943 $62,367
30 $58,541 $59,724 $60,463 $62,887
31 $59,001 $60,184 $60,923 $63,347
32 $59,494 $60,677 $61,416 $63,840
33 $59,987 $61,170 $61,909 $64,333
34 $60,480 $61,663 $62,402 $64,826
35 $60,973 $62,156 $62,895 $65,319
Master’s Degree +
Years of National Board
Experience Certification
0 $42,149
1 $42,583
2 $43,018
3 $43,452
4 $43,886
5 $45,358
6 $45,822
7 $46,285
8 $46,749
9 $47,212
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1339 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

10 $49,728
11 $50,221
12 $50,713
13 $51,206
14 $51,699
15 $53,212
16 $53,705
17 $54,198
18 $54,691
19 $55,184
20 $55,698
21 $56,192
22 $56,685
23 $57,178
24 $57,671
25 $59,153
26 $59,646
27 $60,139
28 $60,632
29 $61,125
30 $61,645
31 $62,105
32 $62,598
33 $63,091
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1339 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

34 $63,584
35 $64,077
B. 1. When determining the minimum salary schedule, “fringe
benefits” shall mean all or part of retirement benefits, excluding
the contributions made pursuant to subsection A of Section 17-108.1
of this title and the flexible benefit allowance pursuant to Section
26-105 of this title from the flexible benefit allowance funds
disbursed by the State Board of Education and the State Board of
Career and Technology Education pursuant to Section 26-104 of this
title.
2. If a school district intends to provide retirement benefits
to a teacher such that the teacher’s salary would be less than the
amounts set forth in the minimum salary schedule specified in
subsection A of this section, the district shall be required to
provide written notification to the teacher prior to his or her
employment or, if already employed by the district, no later than
thirty (30) days prior to the date the district elects to provide
retirement benefits such that the teacher’s salary would be less
than the minimum salary schedule.
C. Any of the degrees referred to in this section shall be from
a college recognized by the State Board of Education. The Board
shall accept teaching experience from out-of-state school districts
that are accredited by the State Board of Education state board of
education or appropriate state accrediting agency for the districts.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1339 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

The Board shall accept teaching experience from out-of-country
schools that are accredited or otherwise endorsed by the appropriate
national or regional accrediting or endorsement authority. Out-of-
country certification documentation in a language other than English
shall be analyzed by an educational credential evaluation service in
accordance with industry standards and guidelines and approved by
the State Department of Education. The person seeking to have
credit granted for out-of-country teaching experience shall be
responsible for all costs of the analysis by a credential evaluation
service. The Board shall accept teaching experience from primary
and secondary schools that are operated by the United States
Department of Defense or are affiliated with the United States
Department of State.
D. For the purpose of state salary increments and retirement,
no teacher shall be granted credit for more than five (5) years of
active duty in the military service, as defined in Section 17-113 of
this title, or out-of-state or out-of-country teaching experience as
a certified teacher or its equivalent. Nothing in this section
shall prohibit boards of education from crediting more years of
experience on district salary schedules than those allowed for state
purposes.
E. The State Board of Education shall recognize, for purposes
of certification and salary increments, all the years of experience
of a:
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1339 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

1. Certified teacher who teaches in the educational program of
the Department of Corrections, beginning with fiscal year 1981;
2. Vocational rehabilitation counselor under the Department of
Human Services if the counselor was employed as a certified teacher
by the State Department of Education when the Division of Vocational
Rehabilitation was transferred from the State Board of Career and
Technology Education or the State Board of Education to the Oklahoma
Public Welfare Commission on July 1, 1968;
3. Vocational rehabilitation counselor which were completed
while employed by the Department of Human Services if such counselor
was certified as a teacher or was eligible for certification as a
teacher in this state;
4. Certified teacher which were completed while employed by the
Child Study Center located at University Hospital Oklahoma
Children’s Hospital, if the teacher was certified as a teacher in
this state; and
5. Certified school psychologist or psychometrist which were
completed while employed as a doctoral intern, psychological
assistant, or psychologist with any agency of this state if the
experience primarily involved work with persons of school- or
preschool-age and if the person was, at the time the experience was
acquired, certified as, or eligible for certification as, a school
psychologist or psychometrist.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1339 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

F. The provisions of this section shall not apply to teachers
who have entered into postretirement employment with a public school
in this state and are still receiving a monthly retirement benefit.
G. If a school district receives either Foundation Aid or
Salary Incentive Aid or receives neither Foundation Aid nor Salary
Incentive Aid pursuant to Section 18-200.1 of this title, funds
appropriated for the financial support of public schools shall be
allocated by the State Board of Education to implement the salary
increases implemented beginning in the 2023-2024 school year
pursuant to Section 1 of Enrolled Senate Bill No. 1119 of the 1st
Session of the 59th Oklahoma Legislature for certified personnel
with zero (0) to twenty-five (25) years of experience. Funds shall
be allocated by January 31, 2027, and by January 31 annually
thereafter.
H. Persons employed as classroom instructional employees of
technology center school districts supervised by the State Board of
Career and Technology Education shall receive a salary increase
amount equal to the amount indicated in subsection A of this section
for the step level indicated for the person persons, provided they
remain employed by the same technology center school district,
unless the hours or the duties of the classroom instructional
employees are reduced proportionately.
H. I. Persons employed as correctional teachers or vocational
instructors by the Department of Corrections pursuant to Section
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1339 SFLR Page 8
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

510. 6a of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes or persons employed as
teachers by the Office of Juvenile Affairs shall receive a salary
increase amount equal to the amount indicated in subsection A of
this section for the step level indicated for the person persons,
provided they remain employed by the same Department of Corrections
or Office of Juvenile Affairs facility, unless the hours or the
duties of the correctional teachers, vocational instructors, or
teachers are reduced proportionately.
I. J. Persons employed as teachers by the State Department of
Rehabilitation Services shall receive a salary increase amount equal
to the amount indicated in subsection A of this section for the step
level indicated for the person persons, provided they remain
employed by the State Department of Rehabilitation Services, unless
the hours or the duties of the teachers are reduced proportionately.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON APPROPRIATIONS
February 25, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED BY CS




SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1339 SFLR Page 9
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)